Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4864.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 5456. (1) "Department" means the department of community
health.
(1) (2) "Deteriorated paint" means paint or other surface
coating that is cracking, flaking, chipping, peeling, or otherwise
damaged or separating from the substrate of a building component.
(2) (3) "Discipline" means 1 of the specific types or
categories of lead-based paint activities identified in this part
for which an individual may receive training from an accredited
training program and become certified by the department.
EMR H01021'25 (H-1) jmwtgd


(3) (4) "Distinct painting history" means the application
history, as indicated by its visual appearance or a record of
application, over time of paint or other surface coatings to a
component or room.
(4) (5) "Documented methodology" means a method or protocol
used to do either or both of the following:
(a) Sample and test for the presence of lead in paint, dust,
and soil.
(b) Perform related work practices as described in rules
promulgated under this part.
(5) (6) "Dust lead hazard" means surface dust in a residential
dwelling or child occupied facility that contains a concentration
of lead at or in excess of levels identified by the EPA pursuant to
section 403 of title IV of the toxic substances control act, Public
Law 94-469, 15 U.S.C. USC 2683, or as otherwise defined by rule.
(6) (7) "Elevated blood lead level" or "EBL" means for
purposes of lead abatement an excessive absorption of lead that is
a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood of 20 ug/dl,
micrograms of lead per deciliter of whole blood, for a single
venous test or of 15-19 ug/dl in 2 consecutive tests taken 3 to 4
months apart. For purposes of case management of children 6 years
of age or less, elevated blood level means an excessive absorption
of lead that is a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood of
10 ug/dl.the lowest of the following:
(a) A concentration of lead in whole blood that is equal to or
greater than 3.5 micrograms per deciliter.
(b) A concentration of lead in whole blood that is equal to or
greater than the blood lead reference value for children, as
determined by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
EMR H01021'25 (H-1) jmwtgd


(7) (8) "Encapsulant" means a substance that forms a barrier
between lead-based paint and the environment using a liquid-applied
coating, with or without reinforcement materials, or an adhesively
bonded covering material.
(8) (9) "Encapsulation" means the application of an
encapsulant.
(9) (10) "Enclosure" means the use of rigid, durable
construction materials that are mechanically fastened to the
substrate in order to act as a barrier between lead-based paint and
the environment.
(10) (11) "EPA" means the United States environmental
protection agency.Environmental Protection Agency.
Final Page
EMR H01021'25 (H-1) jmwtgd